Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-234
County fair; dissolution; submission to voters.

The manner of submitting such proposition shall be governed by the provisions of section 23-126.

Laws 1927, c. 51, § 3, p. 206;

C.S.1929, § 2-224;

R.S.1943, § 2-234.